Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.210

State and local government bond information—Submittal—Contents—Annual report.

For each state or local government bond issued, the underwriter of the issue shall supply the department of commerce with information on the bond issue within twenty days of its issuance. In cases where the issuer of the bond makes a direct or private sale to a purchaser without benefit of an underwriter, the issuer shall supply the required information. The bond issue information shall be provided on a form prescribed by the department of commerce and shall include but is not limited to: (1) The par value of the bond issue; (2) the effective interest rates; (3) a schedule of maturities; (4) the purposes of the bond issue; (5) cost of issuance information; and (6) the type of bonds that are issued. A copy of the bond covenants shall be supplied with this information.

For each state or local government bond issued, the issuer's bond counsel promptly shall provide to the underwriter or to the department of commerce information on the amount of any fees charged for services rendered with regard to the bond issue.

Each local government that issues any type of bond shall make a report annually to the department of commerce that includes a summary of all the outstanding bonds of the local government as of the first day of January in that year. Such report shall distinguish the outstanding bond issues on the basis of the type of bond, as defined in RCW 39.44.200, and shall report the local government's outstanding indebtedness compared to any applicable limitations on indebtedness, including RCW 35.42.200, 39.30.010, and 39.36.020.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2028; 1995 c 399 s 54; 1990 c 220 s 2; 1989 c 225 s 2; 1985 c 130 s 1.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Fiscal agencies: Chapter 43.80 RCW.

Publication of local government bond information by department of commerce—Adoption of rules: RCW 43.63A.155.